Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4911.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1101. As used in this article: (a) "Barber" means a person an individual who shaves or trims the beard of a person; another individual; cuts, trims, shampoos, relaxes, curls, permanently waves, dresses, tints, bleaches, colors, arranges, or styles the hair of a person; another individual; or massages the face and head of a person; another individual. or renders personal services of a similar nature customarily done by a barber. (b) "Barber college" means an establishment which renders that provides for compensation the services of a barber , but having for its whose primary purpose the is teaching for compensation of the theory and practice of serving as a barber. (c) "Barbershop" means a place , or establishment , or premises or part of a premises where a person performs in which 1 or more individuals perform as a barber.barbers. Barbershop includes a mobile barbershop. (d) "Demonstration" means a show, seminar, or contest in which barber services are rendered performed for the purpose of educating barbers. (e) "Demonstrator" means a person an individual who performs a service of a barber services at a demonstration. (f) "Immediate family" means persons residing individuals who reside together and who are related by birth, marriage, or adoption. (g) "Instructor" means a person an individual who instructs another individual in the theory and practice of serving as a barber. (h) "Mobile barbershop" means either of the following: (i) A self-contained vehicle or other device that is moved, towed, or transported from 1 location to another and in which equipment used to perform barber services is installed. (ii) A business in which equipment used to perform barber services is transported to and used on a temporary basis at a location other than the premises of the owner of a barbershop, including, but not limited to, either of the following: (A) A barbershop owned by another person. (B) A client's home. (i) "Owner of a barbershop" means a person that owns and conducts a barbershop. (j) "Premises" means, for a mobile barbershop, 1 of the following, as applicable: (i) For a mobile barbershop described in subdivision (h)(i), the vehicle or other device and the equipment installed in the vehicle or device. (ii) For a mobile barbershop described in subdivision (h)(ii), the equipment used to perform the barber services and the temporary location at which the equipment is used while the equipment is at that location. (k) (h) "Student" means a person an individual learning the theory and practice of serving as a barber. (l) (i) "Student instructor" means a person an individual learning the theory and practice of teaching barbering. Sec. 1111. (1) The department shall issue a license to a barbershop which fulfills all person to own a barbershop, at the premises specified in the license application, if both of the following requirements are met: (a) Has made, through its owner, An application is submitted to the department by the proposed owner of the barbershop. The application shall must include a description of the premises for which licensure is sought. (b) Has satisfactorily At the time licensure is sought, the barbershop has passed an inspection to determine that the barbershop has met meets sanitation and establishment standards prescribed in rules promulgated under this article. (2) A Except for a mobile barbershop described under section 1101(h)(ii), the owner of a barbershop shall be ensure that the barbershop is completely partitioned from a dwelling and shall is not be occupied for lodging or residential purposes. (3) The transfer of A change in the ownership of a barbershop, or, except for a barbershop that is a mobile barbershop, a change in the location of a barbershop shall automatically revoke its revokes the license of that barbershop. A The department shall not grant a new license shall not be granted to a new owner or at a new location unless the requirements of subsection (1) have been fulfilled.are met. (4) The owner of a barbershop shall ensure that the licenses of the barbershop and all barbers working in the barbershop shall be are displayed in a prominent place visible to the public at all times. The license of an individual barber may be posted at the barber's work station. (5) This section applies to a barbershop that is a mobile barbershop beginning on the effective date of the rules promulgated under section 1112 for the operation of mobile barbershops. Sec. 1112. (1) The board shall promulgate rules setting forth standards for sanitation in barbershops and barber colleges. (2) The board shall promulgate rules for the operation of mobile barbershops and the performance of barber services in or at the premises of mobile barbershops. The board shall promulgate rules described in this subsection not more than 18 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection. The rules must include sanitation standards that meet the requirements of subsection (1) and may establish 1 or more of the following for providing barber services in a mobile barbershop: (a) Safety requirements. (b) Permanent address requirements at which 1 or more of the following are located: (i) Records of appointments. (ii) License numbers of employees. (iii) If applicable, the vehicle identification number of the license holder's self-contained facility. (c) Enforcement actions to ensure compliance with the requirements under this article and all local laws and ordinances.